Utah statutes.
7-18a-501.   Supervisory actions by commissioner.
A foreign depository institution authorized by this state to transact business
in this state through an agency, branch, or representative office is subject
to supervisory actions  by the commissioner under Chapter  2, Possession of
Depository Institution by Commissioner, or Chapter 19, Acquisition of Failing
Depository Institutions or Holding Companies,  if the commissioner, with or
without an administrative hearing, finds:
(1)  any of the circumstances set forth in Section 7-2-1;
(2)  that the foreign depository institution is transacting business in or
outside this state in an unsafe and unsound manner;
(3)  that the foreign depository institution or its agency, branch, or
representative office is in an unsafe and unsound condition;
(4)  that the foreign depository institution has ceased to operate its agency,
branch, or representative office without the prior approval of the
commissioner as required in Section 7-18a-202;
(5)  that the foreign depository institution or its agency or branch has
suspended payment of its obligations, has made an assignment for the benefit
of its creditors, or has admitted in writing its inability to pay its debts as
they become due;
(6)  that the foreign depository institution or its agency or branch has
applied for an adjudication of bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, or
other relief under any foreign or domestic bankruptcy, reorganization,
insolvency, or moratorium law, or that any person has applied for any such
relief under such law against the foreign depository institution and the
foreign depository institution has by any affirmative act approved of or
consented to such action or such relief has been granted;
(7)  that a receiver, liquidator, or conservator has been appointed for the
foreign depository institution, or that any proceeding for such an appointment
or any similar proceeding has been initiated in the chartering country;
(8)  that the foreign depository institution's existence or authority to
transact depository institution business under the laws of the chartering
country has been suspended or terminated; or
(9)  that any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time
when the foreign depository institution applied for a certificate of authority
to transact business through an agency, branch, or representative office  in
this state, would have been grounds for denying the application.
